extensions/331662_correutor_asturianu/correutor_asturianu-2.70/dictionaries/ast.aff
FLAG long
SFX Na Y 380
SFX Na u ín/Ys [^cgzáíéu]u
SFX Na u iquín/Ys [^cgzáíéu]u
SFX Na u ucu/Ys [^cgzáíéu]u
SFX Na u ón/Ys [^cgzáíéu]u
SFX Na u acu/Ys [^cgzáíéu]u
SFX Na u ín/Ys [^g]uu
SFX Na u iquín/Ys [^g]uu
SFX Na u ucu/Ys [^g]uu
SFX Na u ón/Ys [^g]uu
SFX Na u acu/Ys [^g]uu
SFX Na uu üín/Ys guu
SFX Na uu üiquín/Ys guu
SFX Na uu uucu/Ys guu
SFX Na uu uón/Ys guu
SFX Na uu uacu/Ys guu
SFX Na cu quín/Ys cu
SFX Na cu quiquín/Ys cu
SFX Na cu cucu/Ys cu
SFX Na cu cón/Ys cu
SFX Na cu cacu/Ys cu
SFX Na gu guín/Ys gu
SFX Na gu guiquín/Ys gu
SFX Na gu gucu/Ys gu
SFX Na gu gón/Ys gu
SFX Na gu gacu/Ys gu
SFX Na zu cín/Ys zu
SFX Na zu ciquín/Ys zu
SFX Na zu zucu/Ys zu
SFX Na zu zón/Ys zu
SFX Na zu zacu/Ys zu
SFX Na u ina/Ys [^cgzáíéu]u
SFX Na u iquina/Ys [^cgzáíéu]u
SFX Na u uca/Ys [^cgzáíéu]u
SFX Na u ona/Ys [^cgzáíéu]u
SFX Na u aca/Ys [^cgzáíéu]u
SFX Na u ína/Ys [^g]uu
SFX Na u iquina/Ys [^g]uu
SFX Na u uca/Ys [^g]uu
SFX Na u ona/Ys [^g]uu
SFX Na u aca/Ys [^g]uu
SFX Na uu üina/Ys guu
SFX Na uu üiquina/Ys guu
SFX Na uu uuca/Ys guu
SFX Na uu uona/Ys guu
SFX Na uu uaca/Ys guu
SFX Na cu quina/Ys cu
SFX Na cu quiquina/Ys cu
SFX Na cu cuca/Ys cu
SFX Na cu cona/Ys cu
SFX Na cu caca/Ys cu
SFX Na gu guina/Ys gu
SFX Na gu guiquina/Ys gu
SFX Na gu guca/Ys gu
SFX Na gu gona/Ys gu
SFX Na gu gaca/Ys gu
SFX Na zu cina/Ys zu
SFX Na zu ciquina/Ys zu
SFX Na zu zuca/Ys zu
SFX Na zu zona/Ys zu
SFX Na zu zaca/Ys zu
SFX Na u inos/Ys [^cgzáíéu]u
SFX Na u iquinos/Ys [^cgzáíéu]u
SFX Na u ucos/Ys [^cgzáíéu]u
SFX Na u onos/Ys [^cgzáíéu]u
SFX Na u acos/Ys [^cgzáíéu]u
SFX Na u inos/Ys [^g]uu
SFX Na u iquinos/Ys [^g]uu
SFX Na u ucos/Ys [^g]uu
SFX Na u onos/Ys [^g]uu
SFX Na u acos/Ys [^g]uu
SFX Na uu üinos/Ys guu
SFX Na uu üiquinos/Ys guu
SFX Na uu uucos/Ys guu
SFX Na uu uonos/Ys guu
SFX Na uu uacos/Ys guu
SFX Na cu quinos/Ys cu
SFX Na cu quiquinos/Ys cu
SFX Na cu cucos/Ys cu
SFX Na cu conos/Ys cu
SFX Na cu cacos/Ys cu
SFX Na gu guinos/Ys gu
SFX Na gu guiquinos/Ys gu
SFX Na gu gucos/Ys gu
SFX Na gu gonos/Ys gu
SFX Na gu gacos/Ys gu
SFX Na zu cinos/Ys zu
SFX Na zu ciquinos/Ys zu
SFX Na zu zucos/Ys zu
SFX Na zu zonos/Ys zu
SFX Na zu zacos/Ys zu
SFX Na u ines/Ys [^cgzáíéu]u
SFX Na u iquines/Ys [^cgzáíéu]u
SFX Na u uques/Ys [^cgzáíéu]u
SFX Na u ones/Ys [^cgzáíéu]u
SFX Na u aques/Ys [^cgzáíéu]u
SFX Na u ines/Ys [^g]uu
SFX Na u iquines/Ys [^g]uu
SFX Na u uques/Ys [^g]uu
SFX Na u ones/Ys [^g]uu
SFX Na u aques/Ys [^g]uu
SFX Na uu üines/Ys guu
SFX Na uu üiquines/Ys guu
SFX Na uu uuques/Ys guu
SFX Na uu uones/Ys guu
SFX Na uu uaques/Ys guu
SFX Na cu quines/Ys cu
SFX Na cu quiquines/Ys cu
SFX Na cu cuques/Ys cu
SFX Na cu cones/Ys cu
SFX Na cu caques/Ys cu
SFX Na gu guines/Ys gu
SFX Na gu guiquines/Ys gu
SFX Na gu guques/Ys gu
SFX Na gu gones/Ys gu
SFX Na gu gaques/Ys gu
SFX Na zu cines/Ys zu
SFX Na zu ciquines/Ys zu
SFX Na zu zuques/Ys zu
SFX Na zu zones/Ys zu
SFX Na zu zaques/Ys zu
SFX Na áu adín/Ys áu
SFX Na áu adina/Ys áu
SFX Na áu adinos/Ys áu
SFX Na áu adines/Ys áu
SFX Na áu adiquín/Ys áu
SFX Na áu adiquina/Ys áu
SFX Na áu adiquinos/Ys áu
SFX Na áu adiquines/Ys áu
SFX Na áu aducu/Ys áu
SFX Na áu aduca/Ys áu
SFX Na áu aducos/Ys áu
SFX Na áu aduques/Ys áu
SFX Na áu adón/Ys áu
SFX Na áu adona/Ys áu
SFX Na áu adonos/Ys áu
SFX Na áu adones/Ys áu
SFX Na áu adacu/Ys áu
SFX Na áu adaca/Ys áu
SFX Na áu adacos/Ys áu
SFX Na áu adaques/Ys áu
SFX Na éu edín/Ys éu
SFX Na éu edina/Ys éu
SFX Na éu edinos/Ys éu
SFX Na éu edines/Ys éu
SFX Na éu ediquín/Ys éu
SFX Na éu ediquina/Ys éu
SFX Na éu ediquinos/Ys éu
SFX Na éu ediquines/Ys éu
SFX Na éu educu/Ys éu
SFX Na éu educa/Ys éu
SFX Na éu educos/Ys éu
SFX Na éu eduques/Ys éu
SFX Na éu edón/Ys éu
SFX Na éu edona/Ys éu
SFX Na éu edonos/Ys éu
SFX Na éu edones/Ys éu
SFX Na éu edacu/Ys éu
SFX Na éu edaca/Ys éu
SFX Na éu edacos/Ys éu
SFX Na éu edaques/Ys éu
SFX Na íu idín/Ys íu
SFX Na íu idina/Ys íu
SFX Na íu idinos/Ys íu
SFX Na íu idines/Ys íu
SFX Na íu idiquín/Ys íu
SFX Na íu idiquina/Ys íu
SFX Na íu idiquinos/Ys íu
SFX Na íu idiquines/Ys íu
SFX Na íu iducu/Ys íu
SFX Na íu iduca/Ys íu
SFX Na íu iducos/Ys íu
SFX Na íu iduques/Ys íu
SFX Na íu idón/Ys íu
SFX Na íu idona/Ys íu
SFX Na íu idonos/Ys íu
SFX Na íu idones/Ys íu
SFX Na íu idacu/Ys íu
SFX Na íu idaca/Ys íu
SFX Na íu idacos/Ys íu
SFX Na íu idaques/Ys íu
SFX Na án anín/Ys án
SFX Na án anina/Ys án
SFX Na án aninos/Ys án
SFX Na án anines/Ys án
SFX Na án aniquín/Ys án
SFX Na án aniquina/Ys án
SFX Na án aniquinos/Ys án
SFX Na án aniquines/Ys án
SFX Na án anucu/Ys án
SFX Na án anuca/Ys án
SFX Na án anucos/Ys án
SFX Na án anuques/Ys án
SFX Na án anón/Ys án
SFX Na án anona/Ys án
SFX Na án anonos/Ys án
SFX Na án anones/Ys án
SFX Na án anacu/Ys án
SFX Na án anaca/Ys án
SFX Na án anacos/Ys án
SFX Na án anaques/Ys án
SFX Na ín inín/Ys ín
SFX Na ín inina/Ys ín
SFX Na ín ininos/Ys ín
SFX Na ín inines/Ys ín
SFX Na ín iniquín/Ys ín
SFX Na ín iniquina/Ys ín
SFX Na ín iniquinos/Ys ín
SFX Na ín iniquines/Ys ín
SFX Na ín inucu/Ys ín
SFX Na ín inuca/Ys ín
SFX Na ín inucos/Ys ín
SFX Na ín inuques/Ys ín
SFX Na ín inón/Ys ín
SFX Na ín inona/Ys ín
SFX Na ín inonos/Ys ín
SFX Na ín inones/Ys ín
SFX Na ín inacu/Ys ín
SFX Na ín inaca/Ys ín
SFX Na ín inacos/Ys ín
SFX Na ín inaques/Ys ín
SFX Na ón onín/Ys ón
SFX Na ón onina/Ys ón
SFX Na ón oninos/Ys ón
SFX Na ón onines/Ys ón
SFX Na ón oniquín/Ys ón
SFX Na ón oniquina/Ys ón
SFX Na ón oniquinos/Ys ón
SFX Na ón oniquines/Ys ón
SFX Na ón onucu/Ys ón
SFX Na ón onuca/Ys ón
SFX Na ón onucos/Ys ón
SFX Na ón onuques/Ys ón
SFX Na ón onón/Ys ón
SFX Na ón onona/Ys ón
SFX Na ón ononos/Ys ón
SFX Na ón onones/Ys ón
SFX Na ón onacu/Ys ón
SFX Na ón onaca/Ys ón
SFX Na ón onacos/Ys ón
SFX Na ón onaques/Ys ón
SFX Na 0 ín/Ys [eo]r
SFX Na 0 ina/Ys [eo]r
SFX Na 0 inos/Ys [eo]r
SFX Na 0 ines/Ys [eo]r
SFX Na 0 iquín/Ys [eo]r
SFX Na 0 iquina/Ys [eo]r
SFX Na 0 iquinos/Ys [eo]r
SFX Na 0 iquines/Ys [eo]r
SFX Na 0 ucu/Ys [eo]r
SFX Na 0 uca/Ys [eo]r
SFX Na 0 ucos/Ys [eo]r
SFX Na 0 uques/Ys [eo]r
SFX Na 0 ón/Ys [eo]r
SFX Na 0 ona/Ys [eo]r
SFX Na 0 onos/Ys [eo]r
SFX Na 0 ones/Ys [eo]r
SFX Na 0 acu/Ys [eo]r
SFX Na 0 aca/Ys [eo]r
SFX Na 0 acos/Ys [eo]r
SFX Na 0 aques/Ys [eo]r
SFX Na és esín/Ys és
SFX Na és esina/Ys és
SFX Na és esinos/Ys és
SFX Na és esines/Ys és
SFX Na és esiquín/Ys és
SFX Na és esiquina/Ys és
SFX Na és esiquinos/Ys és
SFX Na és esiquines/Ys és
SFX Na és esucu/Ys és
SFX Na és esuca/Ys és
SFX Na és esucos/Ys és
SFX Na és esuques/Ys és
SFX Na és esón/Ys és
SFX Na és esona/Ys és
SFX Na és esonos/Ys és
SFX Na és esones/Ys és
SFX Na és esacu/Ys és
SFX Na és esaca/Ys és
SFX Na és esacos/Ys és
SFX Na és esaques/Ys és
SFX Na 0 ín/Ys [bcdfjklñmptvwxy]
SFX Na 0 ina/Ys [bcdfjklñmptvwxy]
SFX Na 0 inos/Ys [bcdfjklñmptvwxy]
SFX Na 0 ines/Ys [bcdfjklñmptvwxy]
SFX Na 0 iquín/Ys [bcdfjklñmptvwxy]
SFX Na 0 iquina/Ys [bcdfjklñmptvwxy]
SFX Na 0 iquinos/Ys [bcdfjklñmptvwxy]
SFX Na 0 iquines/Ys [bcdfjklñmptvwxy]
SFX Na 0 ucu/Ys [bcdfjklñmptvwxy]
SFX Na 0 uca/Ys [bcdfjklñmptvwxy]
SFX Na 0 ucos/Ys [bcdfjklñmptvwxy]
SFX Na 0 uques/Ys [bcdfjklñmptvwxy]
SFX Na 0 ón/Ys [bcdfjklñmptvwxy]
SFX Na 0 ona/Ys [bcdfjklñmptvwxy]
SFX Na 0 onos/Ys [bcdfjklñmptvwxy]
SFX Na 0 ones/Ys [bcdfjklñmptvwxy]
SFX Na 0 acu/Ys [bcdfjklñmptvwxy]
SFX Na 0 aca/Ys [bcdfjklñmptvwxy]
SFX Na 0 acos/Ys [bcdfjklñmptvwxy]
SFX Na 0 aques/Ys [bcdfjklñmptvwxy]
SFX Na z cín/Ys z
SFX Na z cina/Ys z
SFX Na z cinos/Ys z
SFX Na z cines/Ys z
SFX Na z ciquín/Ys z
SFX Na z ciquina/Ys z
SFX Na z ciquinos/Ys z
SFX Na z ciquines/Ys z
SFX Na 0 ucu/Ys z
SFX Na 0 uca/Ys z
SFX Na 0 ucos/Ys z
SFX Na 0 uques/Ys z
SFX Na 0 ón/Ys z
SFX Na 0 ona/Ys z
SFX Na 0 onos/Ys z
SFX Na 0 ones/Ys z
SFX Na 0 acu/Ys z
SFX Na 0 aca/Ys z
SFX Na 0 acos/Ys z
SFX Na 0 aques/Ys z
SFX Na e ín/Ys [^u]e
SFX Na e esina/Ys [^u]e
SFX Na e inos/Ys [^u]e
SFX Na e esines/Ys [^u]e
SFX Na e iquín/Ys [^u]e
SFX Na e esiquina/Ys [^u]e
SFX Na e iquinos/Ys [^u]e
SFX Na e esiquines/Ys [^u]e
SFX Na e ucu/Ys [^u]e
SFX Na e esuca/Ys [^u]e
SFX Na e ucos/Ys [^u]e
SFX Na e esuques/Ys [^u]e
SFX Na e ón/Ys [^u]e
SFX Na e esona/Ys [^u]e
