extensions/331662_correutor_asturianu/correutor_asturianu-2.70/dictionaries/ast.dic
académicu/SaNaGaYs
acreedor/SaNaGaYs
aferventáu/SaNaGaYs
aficionáu/SaNaGaYs
agricultor/SaNaGaYs
aguador/SaNaGaYs
alcalde/SaNaGaYs
alfombreru/SaNaGaYs
alguacil/SaNaGaYs
alumnu/SaNaGaYs
amigu/SaNaGaYs
amu/SaNaGaYs
andoscu/SaNaGaYs
angariyeru/SaNaGaYs
antecesor/SaNaGaYs
antólogu/SaNaGaYs
apaecíu/SaNaGaYs
apareyador/SaNaGaYs
aprendiz/SaNaGaYs
arcabuceru/SaNaGaYs
armador/SaNaGaYs
arqueólogu/SaNaGaYs
arquitectu/SaNaGaYs
artesanu/SaNaGaYs
asesín/SaNaGaYs
astrólogu/SaNaGaYs
auditor/SaNaGaYs
autor/SaNaGaYs
avicultor/SaNaGaYs
ayalgueru/SaNaGaYs
balanchín/SaNaYs
banqueru/SaNaYs
barquilleru/SaNaYs
barrenderu/SaNaYs
bibliógrafu/SaNaYs
biofísicu/SaNaYs
biólogu/SaNaYs
bisbuelu/SaNaYs
bisnietu/SaNaYs
biznietu/SaNaYs
bodegueru/SaNaYs
bomberu/SaNaYs
boticariu/SaNaYs
braceru/SaNaYs
brigadier/SaNaYs
bucaneru/SaNaYs
bulderu/SaNaYs
burreru/SaNaYs
caberu/SaNaYs
cabritín/SaNaYs
cachimán/SaNaYs
caficultor/SaNaYs
calígrafu/SaNaYs
camioneru/SaNaYs
candidatu/SaNaYs
cardiólogu/SaNaYs
carretador/SaNaYs
carrón/SaNaYs
cartógrafu/SaNaYs
catedráticu/SaNaYs
censor/SaNaYs
cerraxeru/SaNaYs
cesteru/SaNaYs
chaperu/SaNaYs
chotu/SaNaYs
cincelador/SaNaYs
clarineru/SaNaYs
cocheru/SaNaYs
collaciu/SaNaYs
comediógrafu/SaNaYs
compromisariu/SaNaYs
concuñáu/SaNaYs
confirmandu/SaNaYs
contertuliu/SaNaYs
corador/SaNaYs
coreógrafu/SaNaYs
correlixonariu/SaNaYs
costeranu/SaNaYs
cruzáu/SaNaYs
cucheru/SaNaYs
cunicultor/SaNaYs
curiosu/SaNaYs
cusu/SaNaYs
decurión/SaNaYs
demógrafu/SaNaYs
descubridor/SaNaYs
devotu/SaNaYs
difuntu/SaNaYs
direutivu/SaNaYs
doctor/SaNaYs
dulceru/SaNaYs
duque/SaNaYs
ecónomu/SaNaGaYs
embarcador/SaNaGaYs
embutidor/SaNaGaYs
empareyador/SaNaGaYs
empresteru/SaNaGaYs
encaxeru/SaNaGaYs
enfermeru/SaNaGaYs
enólogu/SaNaGaYs
entibador/SaNaGaYs
epidemiólogu/SaNaGaYs
escanciador/SaNaGaYs
escuderu/SaNaGaYs
espectador/SaNaGaYs
espositor/SaNaGaYs
estampador/SaNaGaYs
estomatólogu/SaNaGaYs
etólogu/SaNaGaYs
faraón/SaNaYs
ferralleru/SaNaYs
fiastru/SaNaYs
fiscaleru/SaNaYs
floricultor/SaNaYs
fornamenteru/SaNaYs
franquiador/SaNaYs
fruticultor/SaNaYs
fuseru/SaNaYs
gadañín/SaNaYs
garnesín/SaNaYs
gladiador/SaNaYs
godoriu/SaNaYs
gorrafu/SaNaYs
goxeru/SaNaYs
grifón/SaNaYs
gurriatu/SaNaYs
hepatólogu/SaNaGaYs
hermanastru/SaNaGaYs
hipnotizador/SaNaGaYs
histrión/SaNaGaYs
impostor/SaNaGaYs
individuu/SaNaGaYs
inquisidor/SaNaGaYs
investigador/SaNaGaYs
lexicógrafu/SaNaYs
litólogu/SaNaYs
llacayu/SaNaYs
llaringólogu/SaNaYs
llenceru/SaNaYs
llexislador/SaNaYs
llicántropu/SaNaYs
llisteru/SaNaYs
llóxicu/SaNaYs
macacu/SaNaYs
malfechor/SaNaYs
mandatariu/SaNaYs
maquetu/SaNaYs
mariscador/SaNaYs
marranu/SaNaYs
mayador/SaNaYs
mediohermanu/SaNaYs
mensaxeru/SaNaYs
mercenariu/SaNaYs
mesqueru/SaNaYs
micólogu/SaNaYs
milicianu/SaNaYs
mociquín/SaNaYs
molanchín/SaNaYs
monitor/SaNaYs
motán/SaNaYs
muleteru/SaNaYs
museólogu/SaNaYs
nenaxu/SaNaYs
notariu/SaNaYs
ñañu/SaNaYs
odontólogu/SaNaGaYs
operador/SaNaGaYs
otorrinolaringólogu/SaNaGaYs
paisanu/SaNaYs
panaderu/SaNaYs
paquetín/SaNaYs
parcialón/SaNaYs
parru/SaNaYs
partidor/SaNaYs
pastor/SaNaYs
patronu/SaNaYs
pedicuru/SaNaYs
pelliteru/SaNaYs
peritu/SaNaYs
pigarción/SaNaYs
pistoleru/SaNaYs
pornógrafu/SaNaYs
potrancu/SaNaYs
predicador/SaNaYs
prehistoriador/SaNaYs
pretor/SaNaYs
procurador/SaNaYs
propietariu/SaNaYs
proxenitor/SaNaYs
pullu/SaNaYs
quícaru/SaNaYs
quiosqueru/SaNaYs
rameru/SaNaYs
rapazu/SaNaYs
rector/SaNaYs
rellugueru/SaNaYs
reñoveru/SaNaYs
reumatólogu/SaNaYs
rinu/SaNaYs
saludador/SaNaYs
sarxentu/SaNaYs
semiólogu/SaNaYs
sexólogu/SaNaYs
silvicultor/SaNaYs
sociólogu/SaNaYs
soldáu/SaNaYs
subdelegáu/SaNaYs
subsecretariu/SaNaYs
supervisor/SaNaYs
tallereru/SaNaYs
tarangu/SaNaYs
taumaturgu/SaNaYs
templariu/SaNaYs
tesoreru/SaNaYs
tipógrafu/SaNaYs
tocólogu/SaNaYs
tosquilador/SaNaYs
traperu/SaNaYs
traxumán/SaNaYs
trescriptor/SaNaYs
trimu/SaNaYs
tutor/SaNaYs
vagamundu/SaNaYs
veceru/SaNaYs
venáu/SaNaYs
ventrílocuu/SaNaYs
veyu/SaNaYs
vinicultor/SaNaYs
vistor/SaNaYs
vulcanólogu/SaNaYs
xardineru/SaNaYs
xeólogu/SaNaYs
xigantón/SaNaYs
xornaleru/SaNaYs
yeguarizu/SaNaYs
zarragayeru/SaNaYs
